Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,136
Violation of credential holder-consumer privilege; sections, how construed.

Nothing contained in sections 38-1,129 to 38-1,136 shall be construed so as to require any credential holder to violate a privilege between a credential holder and a consumer.

Laws 1982, LB 421, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,205;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 136.